Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER 127A]

EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT

Section

127A-1 Policy and purpose

127A-2 Definitions

127A-3 Hawaii emergency management agency

127A-4 Hawaii advisory council on emergency
management

127A-5 County emergency management agency

127A-6 Emergency reserve corps

127A-7 State warning point

127A-8 Status and rights of personnel

127A-9 Immunities; rights

127A-10 Political activity prohibited

127A-11 Powers on whom conferred; delegation of
powers

127A-12 Emergency management powers, in general

127A-13 Additional powers in an emergency period

127A-14 State of emergency

127A-15 Proclamations, how made; service of papers

127A-16 Major disaster fund

127A-17 Allotments

127A-18 Mitigation of hazardous situations

127A-19 Shelters

127A-20 Immunity from liability of private shelter

127A-21 Notice of requisition

127A-22 Determination of compensation

127A-23 Determination of damages

127A-24 Investigations and surveys

127A-25 Rules and orders

127A-26 Forfeitures

127A-27 Preliminary or interlocutory injunctions
and

temporary restraining orders

127A-28 Enforcement of injunction proceedings;
interventions

127A-29 Misdemeanors

127A-30 Rental or sale of essential commodities
during a state

of emergency; prohibition against price
increases

127A-31 Penalties prescribed by this chapter
additional to

other penalties

127A-32 Effect of this chapter on other laws

Note

Pacific-Asia institute for resilience and sustainability. L
2014, c 229.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next